South Dakota, session 2026, SB19.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-1-47 be AMENDED:
10-1-47. The terms "United States Internal Revenue Code" and "Internal Revenue
Code" mean the United States Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on January
1, 2026. This section applies to §§ 10-4-9.1, 10-4-9.2, 10-4-9.3, 10-4-9.4, 10-4-39, 10-
6-157, and 10-43-10.1, and subdivisions 10-6A-1(7), 10-6B-1(5), 10-18A-1(6), 10-43-
10.3(6), and 10-45A-1(5).

26.373.18 2 19
An Act to revise certain references to the Internal Revenue Code.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 19
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 19 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB19 ENROLLED